Nebraska, session 109, LB747.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB747 LB747
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 29-431, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-431 As used in sections 28-416, 29-422, 29-424, 29-425, 29-431 to
29-434, 48-1231, and 53-173, unless the context otherwise requires,
infraction means the violation of any law, ordinance, order, rule, or
regulation, not including those related to traffic, which is not
otherwise declared to be a misdemeanor or a felony. Infraction includes
violations of section 60-6,267 and beginning January 1, 2024, section
60-6,279.
Sec. 2. Section 48-302, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-302 (1) No child under sixteen years of age shall be employed or
permitted or suffered to work in any employment as defined in section
48-301 within this state unless the person or corporation employing the
child procures and keeps on file, accessible to the attendance officers
and to the Department of Labor and its assistants and employees, an
employment certificate as prescribed in section 48-304 and keeps one
complete list of all such children employed in the building on file in
the building in which such children are employed.
(2) Upon the termination of the employment of a child or when a
child reaches the age of sixteen so registered whose certificate is so
filed, such certificate shall be retained by the employer for at least
twelve months transmitted by the employer to the person authorizing the
certificate pursuant to section 48-303 and shall be accessible to the
attendance officers and to the Department of Labor and its assistants and
employees upon request turned over to such child upon demand.
(3) Any attendance officer or the Department of Labor or its
assistants and employees may demand that any employer in whose place of
business a child apparently under the age of sixteen years is employed or
permitted or suffered to work, and whose employment certificate is not
then filed as required by this section, either furnish within ten days
-2-

LB747 LB747
2026 2026
satisfactory evidence that such child is in fact over sixteen years of
age or cease to employ or permit or suffer such child to work in such
place of business. The same evidence of the age of such child may be
required from such employer as is required on the issuance of an
employment certificate as provided in section 48-304, and the employer
furnishing such evidence shall not be required to furnish any further
evidence of the age of the child.
(4) In case such employer fails to produce and deliver to the
attendance officer or the Commissioner of Labor within ten days after
demand such evidence of the age of any child as may be required under the
provisions of section 48-304 and continues to employ such child or permit
or suffer such child to work in such place of business, proof of the
giving of such notice and of such failure to produce and file such
evidence shall be prima facie evidence in any prosecution brought for a
violation of this section that such child is under sixteen years of age
and is unlawfully employed.
Sec. 3. Section 48-303, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-303 Except as otherwise provided in this section, an employment
certificate shall be approved only by the principal of the school the
child attends or by a person authorized by him or her in writing or, when
there is no principal, by a person authorized by the chief administrative
officer of the school or the superintendent of the school district in
which the child resides, except that no person authorized by this section
may approve such certificate for any child then in or about to enter his
or her own employment or the employment of a firm or corporation of which
he or she is a member, officer, or employee or in whose business he or
she is interested. If a child who resides outside of Nebraska in an
adjoining state seeks to work in Nebraska, the Department of Labor may
approve the employment certificate. The officer or person approving such
certificate may administer the oath provided for therein or in any
-3-

LB747 LB747
2026 2026
investigation or examination necessary for the approval thereof. No fee
shall be charged for approving any such certificate or for administering
any oath or rendering any services related thereto. The school approving
the employment certificate, or the department if the department has
approved the employment certificate, shall establish and maintain proper
records where copies of all such certificates and all documents connected
therewith shall be filed and preserved and shall provide the necessary
clerical services for carrying out sections 48-302 to 48-313. The person
who issued the employment certificate shall report to the department any
complaint concerning the conditions of employment of a child for whom a
certificate is in force. Upon receipt of the report, the department shall
make such investigation as it deems advisable to protect an individual
child or to promote the youth-work program.
Sec. 4. Section 48-309, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-309 The age and schooling certificate provided for herein shall
be made out upon blank forms prescribed and furnished in triplicate by
the Department of Labor.
Sec. 5. Section 48-1231, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1231 (1) An employee having a claim for wages which are not paid
within thirty days of the regular payday designated or agreed upon may
institute suit for such unpaid wages in the proper court. If an employee
establishes a claim and secures judgment on the claim, such employee
shall be entitled to recover the full amount of the judgment and all
costs of such suit, including reasonable attorney's fees. If the cause is
taken to an appellate court and the employee recovers a judgment, the
appellate court shall award reasonable attorney's fees to the employee.
If the employee fails to recover a judgment in excess of the amount that
may have been tendered within thirty days of the regular payday by an
employer, such employee shall not recover the attorney's fees provided by
-4-

LB747 LB747
2026 2026
this subsection. If the court finds that no reasonable dispute existed as
to the fact that wages were owed or as to the amount of such wages, the
court may order the employee to pay the employer's attorney's fees and
costs of the action as assessed by the court.
(2) If an employee works for an employer that is not subject to the
Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act and such employee is aggrieved by a
violation of section 48-1235, the employee may bring a suit against such
employer in the proper court to recover the damages sustained by reason
of such violation. If an employee prevails in a suit brought pursuant to
this subsection, such employee shall be entitled to recover the full
amount of the judgment and all costs of such suit, including reasonable
attorney's fees. If the cause is taken to an appellate court and the
employee recovers a judgment, the appellate court shall award reasonable
attorney's fees to the employee.
(3) An employer who fails to furnish a wage statement under
subsection (2) of section 48-1230 shall be guilty of an infraction as
defined in section 29-431 and shall be subject to a fine pursuant to
section 29-436.
(3) (4) If an employee institutes suit against an employer under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section, any citation that is issued
against such employer under section 48-1234 and that relates directly to
the facts in dispute shall be admitted into evidence unless specifically
excluded by the court. If a citation has been contested as described in
subsection (3) of section 48-1234, it shall not be admitted into evidence
under this subsection until after such contest has been resolved.
Sec. 6. Section 48-1233, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1233 (1) The Commissioner of Labor shall have the authority to
subpoena records and witnesses related to the enforcement of the Nebraska
Wage Payment and Collection Act. The commissioner or his or her agent may
inspect all related records and gather testimony on any matter relative
-5-

LB747 LB747
2026 2026
to the enforcement of the act when the information sought is relevant to
a lawful investigative purpose and is reasonable in scope.
(2) In case of contumacy by or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to
any person, any court of competent jurisdiction, upon application by the
commissioner, may issue to that person an order requiring such person to
appear before the commissioner or the officer designated by the
commissioner to produce documentary evidence if so ordered or to give
evidence touching on the matter under investigation or in question. Any
failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a
contempt of the court.
Sec. 7. Section 48-1234, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1234 (1) The Commissioner of Labor shall issue a citation to an
employer when an investigation reveals that the employer may have
violated the Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act , other than a
violation of subsection (2) of section 48-1230.
(2) When a citation is issued, the commissioner shall notify the
employer of the proposed administrative penalty, if any, by certified
mail or any other manner of delivery by which the United States Postal
Service can verify delivery or by any method of service recognized under
Chapter 25, article 5. The administrative penalty shall be not more than
five hundred dollars in the case of a first violation and not more than
five thousand dollars in the case of a second or subsequent violation.
(3) The employer has fifteen working days after the date of the
citation or penalty to contest such citation or penalty. Notice of
contest shall be sent to the commissioner who shall provide a hearing in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(4) Any employer who has an unpaid citation for a violation of the
Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act shall be barred from contracting
with the state or any political subdivision until such citation is paid.
If a citation has been contested as described in subsection (3) of this
-6-

LB747 LB747
2026 2026
section, it shall not be considered an unpaid citation under this
subsection until after such contest has been resolved.
(5) Citations issued under this section and the names of employers
who have been issued a citation shall be made available to the public
upon request, except that this subsection shall not apply to any
citations that are being contested as described in subsection (3) of this
section.
Sec. 8. Section 48-2107, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-2107 (1) Each application or renewal under section 48-2105 shall
be signed by the applicant and accompanied by a fee not to exceed forty
dollars. The commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to establish the criteria for acceptability of filing documents and
making payments electronically. The criteria may include requirements for
electronic signatures. The commissioner may refuse to accept any
electronic filings or payments that do not meet the criteria established.
The fee shall not be required when an amendment to an application is
submitted. The commissioner shall remit the fees collected under this
subsection to the State Treasurer for credit to the Contractor and
Professional Employer Organization Registration Cash Fund.
(2) A contractor shall not be required to pay the fee under
subsection (1) of this section if (a) the contractor is self-employed and
does not pay more than three thousand dollars annually to employ other
persons in the business and the application contains a statement made
under oath or equivalent affirmation setting forth such information or
(b) the contractor only engages in the construction of water wells or
installation of septic systems. At any time that a contractor no longer
qualifies for exemption from the fee, the fee shall be paid to the
department. Any false statement made under subdivision (2)(a) of this
section shall be a violation of section 28-915.01.
Sec. 9. Section 48-2905, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-7-

LB747 LB747
2026 2026
amended to read:
48-2905 (1) The commissioner may make such investigations as he or
she finds necessary or appropriate to determine whether there is
compliance with the Employee Classification Act. Investigations shall
take place at the times and places as the commissioner directs. For
purposes of any investigation under this section, the commissioner or any
person designated by him or her may interview persons at the worksite,
take photographs, and utilize other reasonable investigatory techniques.
The conduct of the investigation shall be such as to preclude
unreasonable disruption of the operations of the worksite. Investigations
may be conducted, without prior notice, by correspondence, telephone
conversations, or review of materials submitted to the department.
(2) The commissioner or any officer designated by him or her shall
have the power to administer oaths and affirmations, issue subpoenas,
compel the attendance of witnesses, take evidence, and require the
production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements,
or other documents or records which the commissioner deems relevant or
material to the inquiry.
(3) In case of contumacy by or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to
any person, any court of competent jurisdiction, upon application by the
commissioner, may issue to that person an order requiring such person to
appear before the commissioner or the officer designated by the
commissioner to produce documentary evidence if so ordered or to give
evidence touching on the matter under investigation or in question. Any
failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a
contempt of the court.
(4) The department shall establish and operate a hotline and website
for individuals to report suspected violations of the Employee
Classification Act. The hotline and website may be operated in
conjunction with the requirements of the Contractor Registration Act. At
a minimum, the department shall require the reporting individual to
-8-

LB747 LB747
2026 2026
provide contact information and a description of the suspected violation
including the name of the business and job site location. Except to the
extent needed in any administrative hearing, civil action, or criminal
proceeding brought to enforce the Employment Security Law, Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967, or Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, information
obtained by the department under this section or obtained from any
individual pursuant to the administration of the Employee Classification
Act shall be held confidential.
Sec. 10. Original sections 48-309, 48-1231, 48-1233, 48-1234, and
48-2905, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 29-431,
48-302, 48-303, and 48-2107, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
Sec. 11. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
48-307, 48-2906, and 48-2909, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-9-